Georgia statutes. TITLE 23 Equity
Article 2 Parties

23-4-20.
Who may complain in equity.

Any person who may not bring an action at law may complain in equity and every person who is remediless elsewhere may claim the protection and assistance of equity to enforce any right recognized by the law.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 4090; Code 1868, § 4119; Code 1873, § 4178; Code 1882, § 4178; Civil Code 1895, § 4841; Civil Code 1910, § 5414; Code 1933, § 37-1001.